lingvodoc/static/parsers/hfst/anc_xal/rules.xfst
define CaseXxXDattuXxXR11 [ %- d u ] -> [ %- d ü ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXInstbrXxXR12 [ %- b ē r ] -> [ %- y ē r ] || Cons "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAssocCltiXxXR13 [ t a i ] -> [ t e i ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "$" "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAssocCltiXxXR14 [ t a i ] -> [ t o i ] || .#. [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "$" "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAssocCltiXxXR15 [ t a i ] -> [ t ö i ] || .#. [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "$" "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAssocCltiXxXR16 [ t a i ] -> [ t e i ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "$" "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAssocCltiXxXR17 [ t a i ] -> [ t o i ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "$" "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAssocCltiXxXR18 [ t a i ] -> [ t ö i ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "$" "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAssocLatetXxXR19 [ t u ] -> [ t ü ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAssocLatetXxXR20 [ t u ] -> [ t ü ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXInstLaterXxXR21 Vowels -> 0 || _ "$" "+" [ ā r ];
define CaseXxXInstLaterXxXR22 [ ā r ] -> [ ō r ] || [ o | ō ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXInstLaterXxXR23 [ ā r ] -> [ ȫ r ] || [ ö | ȫ ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXInstLaterXxXR24 [ ā r ] -> [ ē r ] || [ e | ē ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXInstLaterXxXR25 [ ā r ] -> [ ū r ] || [ u | ū ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXInstLaterXxXR26 [ ā r ] -> [ ǖ r ] || [ ü | ǖ ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXDattuXxXR27 [ t u ] -> [ d u ] || [ Vowels | Diphthong | LatCons | NazCons ] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXDattuXxXR28 [ t u ] -> [ d u ] || [ Vowels | Diphthong | LatCons | NazCons ] "$" "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXDattuXxXR29 [ t u ] -> [ t ü ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXDattuXxXR30 [ t u ] -> [ t ü ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXDattuXxXR31 [ d u ] -> [ d ü ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXDattuXxXR32 [ d u ] -> [ d ü ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodImpXxXImpPlqtanXxXR0 [ q t a n ] -> [ q t u n ] || [ DiphthongU | u | ū ] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodImpXxXImpPlqtanXxXR1 [ q t a n ] -> [ q t u n ] || [ DiphthongU | u | ū ] Cons "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodImpXxXImpPlqtanXxXR2 [ q t a n ] -> [ q t ü n ] || [ DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodImpXxXImpPlqtanXxXR3 [ q t a n ] -> [ q t ü n ] || [ DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] Cons "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodImpXxXImpPlqtanXxXR4 [ q t a n ] -> [ q t e n ] || [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodImpXxXImpPlqtanXxXR5 [ q t a n ] -> [ q t e n ] || [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] Cons "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodImpXxXImpPlqtanXxXR6 [ q t a n ] -> [ q t o n ] || [ DiphthongO | o | ō ] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodImpXxXImpPlqtanXxXR7 [ q t a n ] -> [ q t o n ] || [ DiphthongO | o | ō ] Cons "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodImpXxXImpPlqtanXxXR8 [ q t a n ] -> [ q t ö n ] || [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ ] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodImpXxXImpPlqtanXxXR9 [ q t a n ] -> [ q t ö n ] || [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ ] Cons "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXApprouzaiXxXR0 [ o u z a i ] -> [ ö ü z e i ] || [ NarSoftVowels | SoftVowels | LongSoftVowels | DiphthongSoft ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXHortyaXxXR1 [ y a ] -> [ y e ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXHortyaXxXR2 [ y a ] -> [ y o ] || .#. [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXHortyaXxXR3 [ y a ] -> [ y ö ] || .#. [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXHortyaXxXR4 [ y a ] -> [ y e ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXHortyaXxXR5 [ y a ] -> [ y o ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXHortyaXxXR6 [ y a ] -> [ y ö ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXHortyXxXR7 [ y ā ] -> [ y ē ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXHortyXxXR8 [ y ā ] -> [ y ō ] || .#. [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXHortyXxXR9 [ y ā ] -> [ y ȫ ] || .#. [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXHortyXxXR10 [ y ā ] -> [ y ē ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXHortyXxXR11 [ y ā ] -> [ y ō ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXHortyXxXR12 [ y ā ] -> [ y ȫ ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXJusstuaiXxXR13 [ t u γ a i ] -> [ t ü g e i ] || [ NarSoftVowels | SoftVowels | LongSoftVowels | DiphthongSoft ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXOptsuXxXR14 [ s u ] -> [ s ü ] || [ NarSoftVowels | SoftVowels | LongSoftVowels | DiphthongSoft ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbTenseXxXPresClmuiXxXR0 [ m u i ] -> [ y u ] || .#. [ b o l u ] "+" _ ;
define VerbTenseXxXPresClmuiXxXR1 [ m u i ] -> [ m ü i ] || [ NarSoftVowels | SoftVowels | LongSoftVowels | DiphthongSoft ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbTenseXxXRemlXxXR2 [ l ā ] -> [ l ē ] || [ NarSoftVowels | SoftVowels | LongSoftVowels | DiphthongSoft ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbTenseXxXRemlaiXxXR3 [ l a i ] -> [ l e i ] || [ NarSoftVowels | SoftVowels | LongSoftVowels | DiphthongSoft ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbTenseXxXEvdiXxXR4 [ č i ] -> [ ǰ i ] || [ Vowels | LatCons ] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumOrddurXxXR0 [ d u γ ā r ] -> [ d ü g ē r ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumOrddurXxXR1 [ d u γ ā r ] -> [ d ü g ē r ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumOrddXxXR2 [ ā d ] -> [ ū d ] || u "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumOrddXxXR3 [ ā d ] -> [ ǖ d ] || ü "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumOrddXxXR4 [ ā d ] -> [ ē d ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumOrddXxXR5 [ ā d ] -> [ ō d ] || .#. [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumOrddXxXR6 [ ā d ] -> [ ȫ d ] || .#. [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumOrddXxXR7 [ ā d ] -> [ ē d ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumOrddXxXR8 [ ā d ] -> [ ō d ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumOrddXxXR9 [ ā d ] -> [ ȫ d ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumAgetaXxXR10 [ t a ] -> [ t e ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumAgetaXxXR11 [ t a ] -> [ t e ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumColoulanXxXR12 [ o u l a n ] -> [ u u l a n ] || .#. u [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumColoulanXxXR13 [ o u l a n ] -> [ u u l a n ] || .#. Cons u [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumColoulanXxXR14 [ o u l a n ] -> [ ö u l e n ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumColoulanXxXR15 [ o u l a n ] -> [ ö u l e n ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumColoulaXxXR16 [ o u l a ] -> [ u u l a ] || .#. u [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumColoulaXxXR17 [ o u l a ] -> [ u u l a ] || .#. Cons u [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumColoulaXxXR18 [ o u l a ] -> [ ö u l e ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumAffXxXNumColoulaXxXR19 [ o u l a ] -> [ ö u l e ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc20XxXR0 n -> 0 || _ "€" "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc20XxXR1 n -> 0 || _ "{" ".#.";
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc20XxXR2 n -> 0 || _ "€" "{" "+" ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR0 [ e n ] -> [ ē n ] || e "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR1 e -> 0 || _ "+" [ ē n ] ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR2 [ e n ] -> [ ā n ] || a "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR3 a -> 0 || _ "+" [ ā n ] ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR4 [ e n ] -> [ ō n ] || o "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR5 o -> 0 || _ "+" [ ō n ] ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR6 [ e n ] -> [ ȫ n ] || ö "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR7 ö -> 0 || _ "+" [ ȫ n ] ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR8 [ e n ] -> [ g e n ] || [ Diphthong | LongVowels ] "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR9 [ e n ] -> [ y ē n ] || Cons "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR10 [ e n ] -> [ b ē n ] || Vowels "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR11 [ e n ] -> [ ē n ] || e "$" "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR12 e -> 0 || _ "$" "+" [ ē n ] ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR13 [ e n ] -> [ ā n ] || a "$" "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR14 a -> 0 || _ "$" "+" [ ā n ] ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR15 [ e n ] -> [ ō n ] || o "$" "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR16 o -> 0 || _ "$" "+" [ ō n ] ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR17 [ e n ] -> [ ȫ n ] || ö "$" "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR18 ö -> 0 || _ "$" "+" [ ȫ n ] ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR19 [ e n ] -> [ g ē n ] || [ Diphthong | LongVowels ] "$" "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR20 [ e n ] -> [ y ē n ] || Cons "$" "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR21 [ e n ] -> [ b ē n ] || Vowels "$" "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR22 [ e n ] -> [ ē n ] || e "$" "{" "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR23 e -> 0 || _ "$" "{" "+" [ ē n ] ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR24 [ e n ] -> [ ā n ] || a "$" "{" "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR25 a -> 0 || _ "$" "{" "+" [ ā n ] ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR26 [ e n ] -> [ ō n ] || o "$" "{" "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR27 o -> 0 || _ "$" "{" "+" [ ō n ] ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR28 [ e n ] -> [ ȫ n ] || ö "$" "{" "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR29 ö -> 0 || _ "$" "{" "+" [ ȫ n ] ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR30 [ e n ] -> [ g ē n ] || [ Diphthong | LongVowels ] "$" "{" "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR31 [ e n ] -> [ y ē n ] || Cons "$" "{" "+" _ ;
define ReflPartXxXReflPartenXxXR32 [ e n ] -> [ b ē n ] || Vowels "$" "{" "+" _ ;
